Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1112
Act; when applicable.

The terms and conditions of the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act shall govern only those pre-need sales made and contracts entered into by any pre-need seller or his, her, or its agents after January 1, 1987. The Burial Pre-Need Sale Act shall not be construed so as to impair or affect the obligation of any lawful contract in existence on or prior to January 1, 1987.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 12.